Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.205.080

Legislative findings—Distribution of funds—Cooperation with school districts.

The legislature recognizes that education centers provide a necessary and effective service for students who have dropped out of common school programs. Education centers have demonstrated success in preparing such youth for productive roles in society and are an integral part of the state's program to address the needs of students who have dropped out of school. The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute funds, consistent with legislative appropriations, allocated specifically for education centers in accord with chapter 28A.205 RCW. The legislature encourages school districts to explore cooperation with education centers pursuant to RCW 28A.150.305.

[ 1997 c 265 s 8; 1993 c 211 s 7; 1990 c 33 s 186; 1987 c 518 s 220. Formerly RCW 28A.97.125.]

NOTES:

Severability—1997 c 265: See note following RCW 13.40.160.

Intent—1994 c 166; 1987 c 518: See note following RCW 43.216.525.

Severability—1987 c 518: See note following RCW 43.216.525.